Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.110

Evidences of indebtedness—As negotiable instruments, legal investments, and security for deposits.

All evidences of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this chapter shall be fully negotiable instruments and shall be legal investment for all state funds or for funds under state control and all funds of municipal corporations, and shall be legal security for all state, county and municipal deposits.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 11.]